Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages

243.020.
License required — Federal license presumptions — Operator of unlicensed place not to permit drinking — Alcoholic beverages not purchased from licensee disallowed on licensed premises — Licenses permitted in moist territory.

A person shall not do any act authorized by any kind of license with respect to the manufacture, storage, sale, purchase, transporting, or other traffic in alcoholic beverages unless the person holds or is an independent contractor, agent, servant, or employee of a person who holds the kind of license that authorizes the act, or is a third party utilized by a direct shipper licensee as set forth in KRS

243.027

.

The holding of any permit from the United States government to traffic in alcoholic beverages without the corresponding requisite state and local licenses shall in all cases raise a rebuttable presumption that the holder of the United States permit is unlawfully trafficking in alcoholic beverages.

Except as permitted by KRS

243.033

,

243.036

,

243.155

,

243.157

, and

243.260

, a person, conducting a place of business patronized by the public, who is not a licensee authorized to sell alcoholic beverages, shall not permit any person to sell, barter, loan, give away, or drink alcoholic beverages on the premises of the place of business.

A licensee shall not permit any consumer to possess, give away, or drink alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises that are not purchased from the licensee.

In a moist territory, the only types of licenses that may be issued are those that directly correspond with the types of sales approved by the voters through moist elections within the territory, unless otherwise specifically authorized by statute.

History.

2554b-150, 2554b-153, 2554b-165, 2554b-194: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 44, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 121, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 121, § 44, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 29, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 201, § 3, effective April 9, 2019; 2020 ch. 80, § 14, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 4, effective March 12, 2021.

243.025.
Fees to be used for administration and enforcement of alcoholic beverage laws.

All of the fees paid into the State Treasury for state licenses shall be credited to a revolving trust and agency account, as provided in KRS

45.253

, for the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

All fees associated with the department’s server training program shall be collected on a cost recovery basis and shall be credited to the revolving trust and agency account established under subsection (1) of this section.

These moneys shall be used solely for the administration and enforcement of KRS Chapters 241 to 244. The moneys in the account shall not lapse at the close of the fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 312, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 518, § 3, effective April 13, 1998; 2004, ch. 20, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 561, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 30, effective June 29, 2017.

243.027.
KRS 243.027 to 243.029 supersedes any conflicting provision of KRS Chapters 241 to 244 — Licensing of direct shippers of alcoholic beverages — Duties of direct shipper licensees — Administrative regulations — Use of third parties to ship — Shipping of samples.

KRS

243.027

to

243.029

shall supersede any conflicting statute in KRS Chapters 241 to 244.

A direct shipper license shall authorize the holder to ship alcoholic beverages to consumers. The department shall issue a direct shipper license to a successful applicant that:

Pays an annual license fee of one hundred dollars ($100);

Is a manufacturer located in this state or any other state or an alcoholic beverage supplier licensed under KRS

243.212

or

243.215

; and

Holds a current license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture or supply alcoholic beverages in the state where the applicant is located. If an applicant is located outside of Kentucky, proof of its current license, permit, or other authorization as issued by its home state shall be sufficient proof of its eligibility to hold a direct shipper license in Kentucky.

A manufacturer applicant shall only be authorized to ship alcoholic beverages that are sold under a brand name owned or exclusively licensed to the manufacturer, provided the alcoholic beverages were:

Produced by the manufacturer;

Produced for the manufacturer under a written contract with another manufacturer; or

Bottled for or by the manufacturer.

An applicant licensed under KRS

243.212

or

243.215

shall only be authorized to ship alcoholic beverages for which it is the primary source of supply.

The department shall establish the form for a direct shipper license application through the promulgation of an administrative regulation. These requirements shall include only the following:

The address of the manufacturer or supplier; and

If the applicant is located outside this state, a copy of the applicant’s current license, permit, or other authorization to manufacture, store, or supply alcoholic beverages in the state where the applicant is located.

For purposes of this section, the holder of a direct shipper license may utilize the services of a third party to fulfill shipments, subject to the following:

The third party shall not be required to hold any alcoholic beverage license, but no licensed entity shall serve as a third party to fulfill shipments other than the holder of a storage license or transporter’s license;

The third party may operate from the premises of the direct shipper licensee or from another business location; and

The direct shipper licensee shall be liable for any violation of KRS

242.250

,

242.260

,

242.270

, or

244.080

that may occur by the third party.

A direct shipper licensee shall:

Agree that the Secretary of State shall serve as its registered agent for service of process. The licensee shall agree that legal service on the agent constitutes legal service on the direct shipper licensee;

Maintain the records required under KRS

243.027

to

243.029

and provide the department and the Department of Revenue access to or copies of these records;

Allow the department or the Department of Revenue to perform an audit of the direct shipper licensee’s records or an inspection of the direct shipper licensee’s licensed premises upon request. If an audit or inspection reveals a violation, the department or the Department of Revenue may recover reasonable expenses from the licensee for the cost of the audit or inspection;

Register with the Department of Revenue, and file all reports and pay all taxes required under KRS

243.027

to

243.029

; and

Submit to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any violation of KRS

242.250

,

242.260

,

242.270

, or

244.080

or for nonpayment of any taxes owed.

Each direct shipper licensee shall submit to the department and the Department of Revenue a quarterly report for that direct shipper license showing:

The total amount of alcoholic beverages shipped into the state per consumer;

The name and address of each consumer;

The purchase price of the alcoholic beverages shipped and the amount of taxes charged to the consumer for the alcoholic beverages shipped; and

The name and address of each common carrier.

The Department of Revenue shall create a form through the promulgation of an administrative regulation for reporting under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The department shall provide a list of all active direct shipper licensees to licensed common carriers on a quarterly basis to reduce the number of unlicensed shipments in the Commonwealth.

A direct shipper licensee shall submit a current copy of its alcoholic beverage license from its home state along with the one hundred dollar ($100) license fee every year upon renewal of its direct shipper license.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a manufacturer located and licensed in Kentucky may ship by a common carrier holding a Kentucky transporter’s license samples of alcoholic beverages produced by the manufacturer in quantities not to exceed one (1) liter, per any recipient, of any individual product in one (1) calendar year of distilled spirits or wine, or ninety-six (96) ounces, per any recipient, of any individual product in one (1) calendar year of malt beverages, to any of the following:

Marketing or media representatives twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverage competitions or contests;

Wholesalers or distributors located outside of Kentucky;

Federal, state, or other regulatory testing labs;

Third-party product formulation and development partners; and

Persons or entities engaged in a private selection event pursuant to KRS

243.0305

.

Such samples shall be marked by affixing across the product label, a not readily removed disclaimer with the words “Sample-Not for Sale” and the name of the manufacturer.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 1, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 3, effective March 29, 2022.

243.028.
Limitations on shipments of alcoholic beverages by direct shipper licensees — Notice and labeling requirements — Recipient age verification and signature required — Penalty for consumer who attempts illegal receipt — Shipping mode requirements.

A direct shipper licensee may sell or ship to a consumer all types of alcoholic beverages that the licensee is authorized to sell, with the following aggregate limits:

Distilled spirits, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) liters per consumer per month;

Wine, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) cases per consumer per month; and

Malt beverages, in quantities not to exceed ten (10) cases per consumer per month.

The direct shipper licensee shall notify the consumer placing the order that the shipment shall not be left unless the recipient of the shipment provides a valid identification document at the time verifying that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. All alcoholic beverage containers shipped to the consumer shall be conspicuously labeled with the words “CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”.

At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment shall present to the individual delivering the package a valid identification document. Prior to transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package shall visually inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by visual examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package shall obtain the signature of the recipient of the shipment. The individual who receives and signs for the alcoholic beverages is not required to be the consumer who purchased the alcoholic beverages.

A consumer who intentionally causes shipment to an address deemed unlawful shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and for each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). In this instance, the direct shipper licensee and the common carrier shall be held harmless.

A direct shipper licensee may not sell or ship alcoholic beverages to a consumer from its licensed premises if the consumer’s address is located in an area in which alcoholic beverages may not be sold or received.

Shipments made pursuant to this section shall be made through a common carrier.

If a common carrier is unable to complete delivery, then the alcoholic beverages shall be returned to the consignor.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective March 12, 2021.

243.029.
Taxes on sales of alcoholic beverages owed by direct shipper licensees.

For purposes of this section, “taxes” associated with the purchase of alcoholic beverages includes any applicable:

Sales tax;

Use tax;

Excise tax;

Wholesale tax equivalent as established in KRS

243.884

;

Regulatory license fees; and

Other assessments.

For purposes of this section and for other tax purposes, each sale and delivery of alcoholic beverages under a direct shipper license is a sale occurring at the address of the consumer. For each tax remittance or collected group of tax remittances, the direct shipper licensee shall include its federal tax identification number.

A direct shipper licensee that sells alcoholic beverages under its direct shipper license for shipment to a consumer shall charge the consumer all applicable taxes and shall sell the alcoholic beverages with all applicable taxes included in the selling price. The total amount of the applicable taxes shall be identified on the consumer’s invoice and shall specifically state the amount of the applicable sales tax included in the invoice.

The amount of the taxes to be paid by the direct shipper licensee under this section shall be calculated based on the sale of the alcoholic beverages occurring at the location identified as the consumer’s address on the shipping label.

For taxes owed by a direct shipper licensee under this section, the direct shipper licensee shall meet the standards of the destination state, including filing a return that contains its license number and federal tax identification number.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 5, effective March 12, 2021; 2021 ch. 156, § 26, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 4, effective March 29, 2022.

243.030.
Distilled spirits and wine licenses — Kinds — Fees.

The following licenses that authorize traffic in distilled spirits and wine may be issued by the distilled spirits administrator. Licenses that authorize traffic in all alcoholic beverages may be issued by both the distilled spirits administrator and malt beverages administrator. The licenses and their accompanying fees are as follows:

Distiller’s license:

Class A, per annum . . . . . $3,090.00

Class B (craft distillery), per annum . . . . . $1,000.00

Off-premises retail sales outlet, per annum $300.00

Rectifier’s license:

Class A, per annum . . . . . $2,580.00

Class B (craft rectifier), per annum . . . . . $825.00

Winery license, per annum . . . . . $1,030.00

Small farm winery license, per annum . . . . . $110.00

Small farm winery off-premises retail license, per annum . . . . . $30.00

Wholesaler’s license, per annum . . . . . $2,060.00

Quota retail package license, per annum . . . . . $570.00

Quota retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $620.00

Transporter’s license, per annum . . . . . $210.00

Special nonbeverage alcohol license, per annum . . . . . $60.00

Special agent’s or solicitor’s license, per annum . . . . . $30.00

Bottling house or bottling house storage license, per annum . . . . . $1,030.00

Special temporary license, per event . . . . . $100.00

Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $520.00

Caterer’s license, per annum . . . . . $830.00

Special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license, per event . . . . . $100.00

Extended hours supplemental license, per annum . . . . . $2,060.00

Hotel in-room license, per annum . . . . . $210.00

Air transporter license, per annum . . . . . $520.00

Sampling license, per annum . . . . . $110.00

Replacement or duplicate license . . . . . $25.00

Entertainment destination center license:

When the licensee is a city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local government, per annum . . . . . $2,577.00

All other licensees, per annum . . . . . $7,730.00

Limited restaurant license, per annum . . . . . $780.00

Limited golf course license, per annum . . . . . $720.00

Small farm winery wholesaler’s license, per annum . . . . . $110.00

Qualified historic site license, per annum . . . . . $1,030.00

Nonquota type 1 license, per annum . . . . . $4,120.00

Nonquota type 2 license, per annum . . . . . $830.00

Nonquota type 3 license, per annum . . . . . $310.00

Distilled spirits and wine storage license, per annum . . . . . $620.00

Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license, per annum . . . . . $1,550.00

Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license, per annum . . . . . $260.00

Authorized public consumption license, per annum . . . . . $250.00

Direct shipper license, per annum . . . . . $100.00

Limited nonquota package license, per annum $300.00

A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new transitional license pursuant to KRS

243.045

.

Other special licenses the board finds necessary for the proper regulation and control of the traffic in distilled spirits and wine and provides for by administrative regulation. In establishing the amount of license taxes that are required to be fixed by the board, it shall have regard for the value of the privilege granted.

The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the same as the fee for the primary retail drink license. There shall be no charge for each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same premises.

A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each new application under this section, except for subsections (4), (8), (9), (10), (12), (15), (19), and (20) of this section. The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if the license is issued; otherwise it shall be retained by the department.

HISTORY:

2554b-114, 2554b-126, 2554b-127: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 101; 1972, ch. 335, § 1; 1976, ch. 381, § 3; 1978, ch. 194, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 432, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 395, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 54, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 219, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 196, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 44, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 95, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 518, § 1, effective April 13, 1998; 2000, ch. 69, § 2, effective March 6, 2000; 2000, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 435, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 217, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 20, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 79, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 179, § 7, effective January 1, 2007; 2007, ch. 99, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 562, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 45, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 80, § 4, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 31, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 5, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 39, § 5, effective March 29, 2022.

243.0305.
Licensed distillers with retail outlets on premises — Payment of taxes — Sale of souvenir packages and private selection packages — Sampling and sale of alcoholic beverages on premises of distillery — Sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at certain events — Sale of products in collaboration with a brewer — Off-premises retail sales outlet.

Any licensed Kentucky distiller that is located in wet territory or in any precinct that has authorized the limited sale of alcoholic beverages at distilleries under KRS

242.1243

and that has a gift shop or other retail outlet on its premises may conduct the activities permitted under this section as a part of its distiller’s license.

For purposes of all retail drink and package sales that occur pursuant to subsection (3), (4), (7), (9), (10), or (12) of this section, the distillery shall:

Be permitted to transfer its products from the distillery proper to the location where those retail sales occur without having to transfer physical possession of those distilled spirits to a licensed wholesaler; and

Without otherwise reporting those distilled spirits to a licensed wholesaler, report those retail sales and pay all taxes required to the Department of Revenue at the time and in the manner required by the Department of Revenue in accordance with its powers under KRS 131.130(3);

A distiller selling distilled spirits in accordance with this subsection shall pay all wholesale sales taxes due under KRS

243.884

. For the purposes of this subsection, “wholesale sales” means a sale of distilled spirits made by a distiller under subsection (3)(b), (4), (7), (9), (10), and (12) of this section, if required by KRS

243.884

, excluding sales made by a distiller under subsection (4)(a)3. and (b) of this section that utilize a licensed wholesaler.

A distiller shall pay the excise tax on distilled spirits in accordance with KRS

243.720

and

243.730

.

All other distilled spirits that are produced by the distillery shall be sold and physically transferred in compliance with all other relevant provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244.

A distiller may sell its own private selection packages and souvenir packages at retail:

To consumers in accordance with KRS

243.027

to

243.029

if it holds a direct shipper license; and

To distillery visitors of legal drinking age, in quantities not to exceed an aggregate of nine (9) liters per purchaser per day.

A distiller may conduct private selection events and sell private selection packages at retail, as follows:

Distillers may sell private selection packages to consumers who participated in a private selection event only by:

Shipping the private selection packages in accordance with KRS

243.027

to

243.029

if the distiller holds a direct shipper license, but these sales and shipments shall be exempt from the quantity limitations established in KRS 243.028(1);

Selling the private selection packages to the participating consumers directly from the distillery premises, but these sales shall be exempt from the quantity limitations established in subsection (3)(b) of this section; or

Selling the private selection packages through a wholesaler and to a licensed retailer of the consumer’s choice. The distillery and wholesaler’s cooperation in facilitating the sale of the private selection packages to the retailer of the consumer’s choice shall not be deemed a violation of KRS

244.240

.

Except as provided in KRS

243.036

, distillers may sell private selection packages to retail licensees that participated in a private selection event only through a licensed wholesaler.

A distillery shall make available for purchase not less than seventy percent (70%) of its annual private selection packages to licensed wholesalers and shall maintain records of such transactions in accordance with KRS

244.150

.

Distillers may sell private selection packages to wine and distilled spirits wholesalers, malt beverage distributors, and microbreweries that hold a quota retail drink or quota retail package license that participated in a private selection event if the private selection packages resulting from the event are sold only through a licensed retailer.

Hours of sale for souvenir packages sold at retail and private selection packages sold at retail shall be in conformity with KRS 244.290(3).

Except as provided in this section, souvenir package and private selection package sales to distillery visitors shall be governed by all the statutes and administrative regulations governing the retail sale of distilled spirits by the package.

Souvenir packages sold to distillery visitors under subsection (3)(b) of this section, which are not made available to wholesalers licensed in Kentucky or elsewhere, shall be registered by the licensed distiller with the department and shall be sold exclusively to in-person distillery visitors in quantities not to exceed three (3) liters per person per day.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS

244.050

to the contrary, a distillery holding a sampling license may allow visitors to sample distilled spirits under the following conditions:

Sampling shall be permitted only on the licensed premises during regular business hours;

A distillery shall not charge for the samples; and

A distillery shall not provide more than one and three-fourths (1-3/4) ounces of samples per visitor per day, except in connection with a private selection event.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

243.110

, in accordance with this section, a distillery located in wet territory or in any territory that has authorized the limited sale of alcoholic beverages under an election held pursuant to KRS

242.1243

may:

Hold an NQ2 retail drink license for the sale of alcoholic beverages on the distillery premises; and

Employ persons to engage in the sale or service of alcohol under an NQ2 license, if each employee completes the department’s Server Training in Alcohol Regulations program within thirty (30) days of beginning employment.

A distiller may sell to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of events located in wet territory. A distiller may:

Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink, containing spirits distilled or bottled on the premises of the distillery;

Sell by the package in quantities not to exceed nine (9) liters per person, per day; and

Serve complimentary samples not to exceed one and three-fourths (1-3/4) ounces per person, per day.

A distiller may offer for sale in its gift shop products that were produced in collaboration with a brewer or microbrewer, except that:

These packages shall not be exclusive to the distiller’s gift shop; and

The distiller shall purchase the jointly branded souvenir package only from a licensed malt beverage distributor or a microbrewery pursuant to KRS 243.157(1)(f). A microbrewery selling and delivering the jointly branded souvenir package directly to a distiller under this subsection shall provide notice to the distributor of any self-distribution delivery by electronic or other means.

A distiller that sells souvenir packages and serves complimentary samples in accordance with this section at any of its licensed premises may, for each such premises, maintain one (1) separately licensed off-premises retail sales outlet and engage in the activities and hold the licenses authorized in subsections (3), (4), (8), (9), and (11) of this section if the off-premises retail sales outlet premises are located in wet territory or in a precinct that has authorized alcoholic beverage sales by the distillery under KRS

242.1243

. The distiller shall pay the fee required under KRS

243.030

for each off-premises retail sales outlet it maintains.

Except as expressly stated in this section, this section does not exempt the holder of a distiller’s license from:

The provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244;

The administrative regulations of the board; and

Regulation by the board at all the distiller’s licensed premises.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to vitiate the policy of this Commonwealth supporting an orderly three (3) tier system for the production and sale of alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 102, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2013, ch. 121, § 46, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 5, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 164, § 1, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 15, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 12, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 6, effective March 29, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). A reference to “KRS

243.895

” in this statute has been changed in codification to read “KRS

243.890

.” In
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 80, sec. 5, subsection (8)(b)2. refers to “tax collections imposed pursuant to
KRS

243.710

to

243.895

.” It is obvious from the context that the citation of this range should not include the final section,
KRS 243.895, which is a statute on an unrelated topic. Under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has inserted the correct reference.

243.0307.
Sampling license — Sampling and sale of alcoholic beverages on premises of licensed retailer.

A sampling license may be issued to the holder of:

A quota retail drink license;

A quota retail package license;

A nonquota retail malt beverage package license;

An NQ1 license;

An NQ2 license;

An NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license; or

A distiller’s license.

A sampling license shall authorize the licensee to allow customers to sample, free of charge, distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages under the following conditions:

Sampling shall be permitted only on licensed premises and by licensees holding a sampling license, during regular business hours;

A distillery shall provide samples as authorized by KRS

243.0305

;

All other licensees shall limit a customer to:

One (1) ounce of distilled spirits samples per day;

Six (6) ounces of wine samples per day; or

Twelve (12) ounces of malt beverage samples per day; and

A brewer, microbrewery, or out-of-state malt beverage supplier may conduct a sampling of malt beverages as permitted by this section at the licensed premises of a retailer licensee holding a sampling license.

Retailers holding a sampling license shall:

Notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control at least seven (7) days in advance of conducting a free sampling event; and

Limit a sampling event to a period not to exceed four (4) consecutive hours between 12 noon and 8 p.m.

In addition to free sampling, a quota retail package licensee holding a sampling license may also sell sample distilled spirits and wine under the following conditions:

Paid samples may be sold only on licensed premises and by licensees holding a sampling license, during regular business hours; and

A licensee shall limit a customer to purchased samples totaling no more than:

Two (2) ounces of distilled spirits per day; and

Nine (9) ounces of wine per day.

A quota retail package licensee holding both a sampling license and a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may also sell samples of malt beverages under the following conditions:

Paid samples may be sold only on licensed premises and by licensees holding a sampling license, during regular business hours;

A licensee shall limit a customer to no more than sixteen (16) ounces of malt beverages per day; and

The retail price of a sample shall not be less than a licensee’s purchase cost of the sample.

No customer shall be allowed to receive a combination of free and purchased samples totaling more than:

Two (2) ounces of distilled spirits per day; and

Nine (9) ounces of wine per day.

Free and paid samples provided under this section shall not constitute drink sales.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 62, § 28, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 12, effective July 15, 2020.

243.031.
Winery licenses. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 381, § 1; 1990, ch. 54, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 381, § 1;
1990, ch. 54, § 4, effective July 13, 1990) was repealed by Acts
2017, ch. 134, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

243.032.
Restaurant wine license. [Repealed.]

243.033.
Caterer’s license.

A caterer’s license may be issued as a supplementary license to a caterer that holds a quota retail package license, a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 license, an NQ2 license, or a limited restaurant license.

The caterer’s license may be issued as a primary license to a caterer in any wet territory or in any moist territory under KRS

242.1244

for the premises that serves as the caterer’s commissary and designated banquet hall. No primary caterer’s license shall authorize alcoholic beverage sales at a premises that operates as a restaurant. The alcoholic beverage stock of the caterer shall be kept under lock and key at the licensed premises during the time that the alcoholic beverages are not being used in conjunction with a catered function.

The caterer’s license shall authorize the caterer to:

Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS

243.088

,

243.250

, and

244.260

;

Transport, sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic beverages by the drink at locations away from the licensed premises or at the caterer’s designated banquet hall in conjunction with the catering of food and alcoholic beverages for a customer and the customer’s guests, in:

Cities and counties established as moist territory under KRS

242.1244

if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least seventy percent (70%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages;

Precincts established as moist territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least ten percent (10%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages. This subparagraph shall supersede any conflicting provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244;

Wet cities and counties in which quota retail drink licenses are not available if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages; or

All other wet territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages;

Receive and fill telephone orders for alcoholic beverages in conjunction with the ordering of food for a catered event; and

Receive payment for alcoholic beverages served at a catered event on a by-the-drink, cash bar, or by-the-event basis. The caterer may bill the customer for by-the-function sales of alcoholic beverages in the usual course of the caterer’s business.

A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages at locations for which retail alcoholic beverage licenses or special temporary licenses have been issued. A caterer licensee may cater a fundraising event for which a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license has been issued under KRS

243.036

.

A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages on Sunday except in territory in which the Sunday sale of alcoholic beverages is permitted under the provisions of KRS

244.290

and

244.480

.

The location at which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, and delivered by a caterer, pursuant to this section, shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of KRS Chapter 222. If the location is a multi-unit structure, only the unit or units at which the function being catered is held shall be excluded from the public place provisions of KRS Chapter 222.

The caterer licensee shall post a copy of the licensee’s caterer’s license at the location of the function for which alcoholic beverages are catered.

All restrictions and prohibitions applying to a quota retail drink licensee and an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink licensee not inconsistent with this section shall apply to the caterer licensee.

The caterer licensee shall maintain records as set forth in KRS

244.150

and in administrative regulations promulgated by the board.

Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, a caterer may serve alcoholic beverages to guests who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older at a private event in dry territory if:

The alcoholic beverages were lawfully purchased in a wet or moist territory:

By an individual; or

At the caterer’s licensed premises in wet or moist territory; and

The alcoholic beverages are not sold in dry territory to guests at the private residence or private event regardless of whether the venue is a public place.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 196, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2016 ch. 80, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 33, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 201, § 4, effective April 9, 2019; 2022 ch. 104, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

243.034.
Business authorized by limited restaurant license within wet territory or certain moist precincts — Prohibition against sale of alcohol without meal — Package sales prohibited.

A limited restaurant license may be issued to an establishment meeting the definition criteria established in KRS 241.010(37) as long as the establishment is within:

Any wet territory; or

Any moist precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS

242.1244

.

A limited restaurant license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS

243.081

. The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The license shall not authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages by the package.

The holder of a limited restaurant license shall maintain at least seventy percent (70%) of its gross receipts from the sale of food and maintain the minimum applicable seating requirement required for the type of limited restaurant license.

A limited restaurant as defined by KRS 241.010(37)(a) shall:

Only sell alcoholic beverages incidental to the sale of a meal; and

Not have an open bar and shall not sell alcoholic beverages to any person who has not purchased or does not purchase a meal.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 37, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 80, § 7, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 34, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 6, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 20, § 2, effective March 15, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 14, effective March 29, 2022.